Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0834.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17b. (1) The owner of a sign, the agent of the owner of a sign, or a property owner or the agent of a property owner with whom the sign owner has a contractual relationship to maintain the sign on his or her that property shall not cross a limited access right-of-way to erect or maintain a sign without a permit issued under subsection (3). (2) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the department shall not issue a permit to cross a limited access right-of-way for purposes of erecting or maintaining a sign to the owner of a sign, the agent of the owner of a sign, or a property owner or the agent of a property owner with whom the sign owner has a contractual relationship to maintain the sign on his or her that property. (3) The department shall issue a permit to cross a limited access right-of-way for the purposes of erecting or maintaining a sign to the owner of a sign, the agent of the owner of a sign, or a property owner or the agent of a property owner with whom the sign owner has a contractual relationship to maintain the sign on that property if the property is only accessible by crossing the limited access right-of-way. (4) (3) If the owner of a sign, the agent of the owner of a sign, or a property owner or the agent of a property owner with whom the sign owner has a contractual relationship to maintain the sign on his or her that property accesses a sign by crossing a limited access right-of-way to erect or maintain the sign without a permit issued under subsection (3), the owner of the sign is subject to the following penalties: (a) For the first violation, a fine of $1,000.00 for each sign location. (b) For a second violation, removal of the sign and sign structure and cancellation of the permit associated with the sign.